Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-103
Rules; copies; posting in jails.

The sheriff or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail shall, immediately on the receipt of the rules, cause a copy thereof to be posted up and continued in some conspicuous place in every room or cell of the jail.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 3, p. 243;

R.S.1913, § 3531;

C.S.1922, § 2998;

C.S.1929, § 47-103;

R.S.1943, § 47-103;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 11.